Maryland, session 2026, HB1573.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–758.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CAMPAIGN FINANCE ENTITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
1–101 OF THE ELECTION LAW ARTICLE.
(3) “POLITICAL CONTRIBUTION” MEANS THE GIFT OF MONEY TO:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1573*

HOUSE BILL 1573
(I) PROMOTE OR ASSIST IN THE PROMOTION OF THE SUCCESS
OR DEFEAT OF A CANDIDATE, POLITICAL PARTY, QUESTION, OR PROSPECTIVE
QUESTION; OR
(II) ASSIST IN THE PAYMENT OF EXPENSES ASSOCIATED WITH
CONTESTING AN ELECTION UNDER TITLE 12 OF THE ELECTION LAW ARTICLE.
(4) “TAXPAYER” MEANS:
(I) AN INDIVIDUAL FILING AN INCOME TAX RETURN; OR
(II) A MARRIED COUPLE FILING A JOINT INCOME TAX RETURN.
(B) SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THIS SECTION, A TAXPAYER MAY
CLAIM A CREDIT AGAINST THE STATE INCOME TAX FOR POLITICAL CONTRIBUTIONS
PAID TO A CAMPAIGN FINANCE ENTITY DURING THE TAXABLE YEAR.
(C) THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT EXCEED:
(1) $50 FOR AN INDIVIDUAL; OR
(2) $100 FOR A MARRIED COUPLE FILING A JOINT RETURN.
(D) FOR ANY TAXABLE YEAR, THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION
MAY BE CLAIMED ONLY ONCE BY A TAXPAYER.
(E) IF THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION IN ANY TAXABLE YEAR
EXCEEDS THE STATE INCOME TAX FOR THAT TAXABLE YEAR, THE TAXPAYER MAY
CLAIM A REFUND IN THE AMOUNT OF THE EXCESS.
(F) (1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2027, AND EACH DECEMBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY ON THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION, INCLUDING:
(I) THE NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS WHO HAVE CLAIMED THE
CREDIT; AND
(II) THE CREDIT’S TOTAL FISCAL IMPACT ON THE STATE.
(2) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL PUBLISH THE ANNUAL REPORT
REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION ON THE COMPTROLLER’S
PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE WEBSITE.

HOUSE BILL 1573 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, but
before January 1, 2031. It shall remain effective for a period of 6 years and, at the end of
June 30, 2032, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.